Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1208HV (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 270 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âSyllabus Transparency Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. a. Direct each institution of 5 higher learning under its control to make available to the 6 public on the institutionâs internet site a syllabus for each 7 undergraduate course offered for credit by the institution. 8 The syllabus shall include all of the following: 9 (1) The name of the instructor. 10 (2) A brief description of each major course requirement, 11 including each major assignment and examination. 12 (3) Any required or recommended reading material. 13 b. The syllabus information made available to the public 14 pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall be subject to the following 15 requirements: 16 (1) The information shall be accessible from the 17 institutionâs internet site home page by use of no more than 18 five links. 19 (2) The information shall be searchable by keywords and 20 phrases. 21 (3) The information shall be accessible to the public 22 without requiring registration or use of a user name, password, 23 or other user identification. 24 (4) The information shall be made available no later than 25 the first day of classes for the semester or other academic 26 term during which the section of the course is offered. 27 (5) The information shall be updated as soon as practicable 28 after the information changes. 29 (6) The information shall remain available on the 30 institutionâs internet site for at least one year after the 31 date on which the institution initially made the information 32 available. 33 c. This subsection does not apply to an undergraduate course 34 that does not regularly meet in a classroom setting, including 35 -1- LSB 1208HV (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 270 but not limited to an internship, independent study program, 1 or study abroad program. 2 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect December 31, 3 2025. 4